Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4014.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Task Force on Taxation of International Income is established.
(2) The task force consists of 11 members appointed as follows:
(a) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint four nonvoting members
from among members of the House of Representatives, with not more than two members
being from the same political party.
(b) The President of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members from among
members of the Senate, with each member being from a different political party.
(c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint five members as follows:
(A) One member representing Oregon-based labor unions.
(B) One member representing Oregon-based businesses.
(C) One member representing international corporations based in Oregon.
(D) One member who is an Oregon-based expert on international income tax policy.
(E) One member who is a nationally recognized expert on international income tax policy.
(3) The task force shall investigate whether changes to Oregon’s tax code could improve
or simplify the state’s tax treatment of international income and explore other broader po-
tential statutory changes.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 195

A-Eng. HB 4014
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall select one member of the task
force to serve as chairperson and another to serve as vice chairperson, for the terms and
with the duties and powers necessary for the performance of the functions of the offices as
the Speaker determines.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to revenue no later than December 1, 2026. The report must address the
subjects described in subsection (3) of this section.
(11) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative Assembly serve
as volunteers on the task force and, unless they are qualified members, as defined in ORS
292.495, are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on December 31, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[2]